Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section  3, chapter 91, Oregon Laws 2022, as amended by section 8, chapter 92,
Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  Notwithstanding any provision of the state building code, as defined in ORS 455.010, a
single-family detached dwelling that is used to operate a residential training home, as  defined in
ORS 443.400, or an adult foster  home, as defined in ORS 443.705, is not required to have installed
an automatic sprinkler system if:
(1) The dwelling has been operated as a residential training home  or an adult foster home pur-
suant to a license issued prior to July 1, [ 2026] 2028;
(2) The operator is licensed to serve five or fewer individuals in the dwelling; and
(3) The operator and the dwelling meet all other fire, life and safety  requirements established
by the Department of Human Services or the Oregon Health Authority by rule.
SECTION 2.
 Section  9, chapter 91, Oregon Laws 2022, as amended by section 9, chapter 92,
Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  Section 3, chapter 91, Oregon Laws 2022, is repealed on January 2, [ 2027] 2029.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1066 (SB 1066-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate April 1, 2025
Repassed by Senate June 5, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 3, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1066 (SB 1066-A) Page 2